Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-817
Judicial officeholder; retention election; determination by vote of electorate.

If the majority of the electors voting with regard to said question at said election vote in the affirmative, said judge shall be retained in office for an additional term. If the majority of the voters voting on said question at said election vote in the negative, a vacancy in said office shall occur at the end of the term of office of said judge.

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 5, p. 478.